North Dakota statutes. TITLE 24 Highways, Bridges, And Ferries
CHAPTER 24-01 State Highway System

24-01-01.
Declaration of legislative intent.

Adequate roads and streets provide for the free flow of traffic; result in low cost of motor vehicle operation; protect the health and safety of the citizens of the state; increase property value; and generally promote economic and social progress of the state. Therefore, the legislative assembly hereby determines and declares that an adequate and integrated system of roads and streets is essential to the general welfare of the state of North Dakota.

In designating the highway systems of this state, as hereinafter provided, the legislative assembly places a high degree of trust in the hands of those officials whose duty it is, within the limits of available funds, to plan, develop, operate, maintain, and protect the highway facilities of this state, for present as well as for future use. To this end, it is the intent of the legislative assembly to make the director of the department, and the department acting through the director, custodian of the state highway system and to provide sufficiently broad authority to enable the director of the department to function adequately and efficiently in all areas of appropriate jurisdiction with specific details to be determined by reasonable rules and regulations which may be promulgated by the director, subject to the limitations of the constitution and the legislative mandate hereinafter imposed.

It is recognized that the efficient management, operation, and control of our county roads, city streets, and other public thoroughfares are likewise a matter of vital public interest. Therefore, it is the further intent of the legislative assembly to bestow upon the boards of county commissioners similar authority with respect to the county road system and to local officials with respect to the roads under their jurisdiction.

While it is necessary to fix responsibilities for the construction, maintenance, and operation of the several systems of highways, it is intended that the state of North Dakota shall have an integrated system of all roads and streets to provide safe and efficient highway transportation throughout the state. To this end, it is the intent of the legislative assembly to give broad authority and definite responsibility to the director of the department and to the boards of county commissioners so that working together, free from political pressure and local interests, they may provide for the state an integrated system of state and county highways built upon a basis of sound engineering with full regard to the interest and well-being of the state as a whole.

Providing adequate public highway facilities, including rural and urban links, is hereby declared to be a proper public use and purpose and the legislative assembly hereby determines and declares that chapter 177 of the Session Laws of 1953 is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, for the promotion of the general welfare, and as a contribution to the national defense.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-A0101.

Cross-References.

Integrated highway system, declaration of legislative intent, see § 39-01-01.1.

24-01-01.1.
Definition of words and phrases.

The following words and phrases when used in this title shall, for the purposes of this title, have the meanings respectively ascribed to them in this chapter:

“Abandonment” means cessation of use of right of way or activity thereon with no intention to reclaim or use again for highway purposes.

“Acquisition or taking” means the process of obtaining right of way.

“Arterial highway” means a general term denoting a highway primarily for through traffic, usually on a continuous route.

“Belt highway” means an arterial highway for carrying traffic partially or entirely around an urban area or portion thereof.

“Capacity” means the ability of a roadway to accommodate traffic.

“Commission” means the public service commission of the state of North Dakota.

“Commissioner” means the director of the department of transportation of this state, acting directly or through authorized agents as provided in section 24-02-01.3.

“Consequential damages” means loss in value of a parcel, no portion of which is acquired, resulting from a highway improvement.

“Controlled-access facility” means a highway or street especially designed for through traffic, and over, from, or to which owners or occupants of abutting land or other persons have no right or easement or only a controlled right or easement of access, light, air, or view by reason of the fact that their property abuts upon such controlled-access facility or for any other reason.

“County road system” means the system of secondary highways designated by the county officials, the responsibility for which is lodged with the counties.

“Department” means the department of transportation of this state as provided by section 24-02-01.1.

“Direct compensation” means payment for land or interest in land and improvements actually acquired for highway purposes.

“Director” means the director of the department of transportation of this state, acting directly or through authorized agents as provided in section 24-02-01.3.

“Divided highway” means a highway with separated roadways for traffic in opposite directions.

“Easement” means a right acquired by public authority to use or control property for a designated highway purpose.

“Employee compensation” includes vacation and sick leave.

“Expressway” means a divided arterial highway for through traffic with full or partial control of access and generally with grade separations at intersections.

“Fee simple” means an absolute estate or ownership in property including unlimited power of alienation, except as to any and all lands acquired or taken for highway, road, or street purposes. Where lands are taken for such purposes, “fee simple” shall not be deemed to include any oil, gas, or fluid mineral rights.

“Freeway” means an expressway with full control of access.

“Frontage street or road” means a local street or road auxiliary to and located on the side of an arterial highway for service to abutting property and adjacent areas and for control of access.

“Grade crossing” means the intersection of a public highway and of the track or tracks of any railroad, however operated, on the same plane or level, other than a street railway within the limits of a city.

“Highway, street, or road” means a general term denoting a public way for purposes of vehicular travel, including the entire area within the right of way. A highway in a rural area may be called a “road”, while a highway in an urban area may be called a “street”.

“Intersection” means a general term denoting the area where two or more highways join or cross.

“Interstate system” or “interstate highway system” means that part of the state highway system designated as the North Dakota portion of the national system of interstate and defense highways as provided for in Public Law 85-767 [23 U.S.C. 101 et seq.].

“Local street or local road” means a street or road primarily for access to residence, business, or other abutting property.

“Major street or major highway” means an arterial highway with intersections at grade and direct access to abutting property, and on which geometric design and traffic control measures are used to expedite the safe movement of through traffic.

“Market value” means the highest price for which property can be sold in the open market by a willing seller to a willing purchaser, neither acting under compulsion and both exercising reasonable judgment.

“Median” means the portion of a divided highway separating the traveled ways for traffic in opposite directions.

“Municipal corporation or municipality” means all cities organized under the laws of this state, but does not include any other political subdivisions.

“Outer separation” means the portion of an arterial highway between the traveled ways of a roadway for through traffic and a frontage street or road.

“Partial taking” means the acquisition of a parcel of property.

“Person” means any person, firm, partnership, association, corporation, limited liability company, organization, or business trust.

“Radial highway” means an arterial highway leading to or from an urban center.

“Remainder” means the portion of a parcel retained by the owner after a part of such parcel has been acquired.

“Remnant” means a remainder so small or irregular that it usually has little or no economic value to the owner.

“Right of access” means the right of ingress to a highway from abutting land and egress from a highway to abutting land.

“Right of survey entry” means the right to enter property temporarily to make surveys and investigations for proposed highway improvements.

“Right of way” means a general term denoting land, property, or interest therein, acquired for or devoted to highway purposes and shall include, but not be limited to publicly owned and controlled rest and recreation areas, sanitary facilities reasonably necessary to accommodate the traveling public, and tracts of land necessary for the restoration, preservation, and enhancement of scenic beauty adjacent to the state highway system.

“Right-of-way appraisal” means a determination of the market value of property including damages, if any, as of a specified date, resulting from an analysis of facts.

“Right-of-way estimate” means an approximation of the market value of property including damages, if any, in advance of an appraisal.

“Roadside” means a general term denoting the area adjoining the outer edge of the roadway. Extensive areas between the roadways of a divided highway may also be considered roadside.

“Roadway” means in general, the portion of a highway, including shoulders, for vehicular use. In construction specifications, the portion of a highway within limits of construction.

“Severance damages” means loss in value of the remainder of a parcel resulting from an acquisition.

“Shoulder” means the portion of the roadway contiguous with the traveled way for accommodation of stopped vehicles, for emergency use, and for lateral support of base and surface courses.

“State highway system” means the system of state principal roads designated by the director of the department, the responsibility for which is lodged in the department.

“Through street or through highway” means every highway or portion thereof on which vehicular traffic is given preferential right of way, and at the entrances to which vehicular traffic from intersecting highways is required by law to yield right of way to vehicles on such through highways and in obedience to either a stop sign or yield sign, when such signs are erected by law.

“Traffic lane” means the portion of the traveled way for the movement of a single line of vehicles.

“Traveled way” means the portion of the roadway for the movement of vehicles, exclusive of shoulders and auxiliary lanes.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 2; 1957, ch. 187, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-A0102; S.L. 1959, ch. 235, § 4; 1963, ch. 211, § 1; 1967, ch. 291, § 18; 1967, ch. 323, § 77; 1969, ch. 343, § 2; 1975, ch. 236, § 1; 1989, ch. 72, § 8; 1991, ch. 54, § 9; 1991, ch. 287, § 1; 1991, ch. 288, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

Cross-References.

Word defined by statute always has same meaning, see § 1-01-09.

24-01-01.2.
State highway system — Mileage.

The state highway system may not exceed seven percent of the entire road mileage of the state, whether such roads are township, county, or state roads, which may be functionally classified as to service, and in no case may such highway system exceed seven thousand seven hundred miles [12391.95 kilometers] in length.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 159, § 1; 1931, ch. 156, § 1; 1933, ch. 127, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 24-0101; S.L. 1975, ch. 236, § 2.

24-01-02.
Designation of state highway system.

The director is hereby vested with complete authority to designate, locate, create, and determine what roads, highways, and streets constitute the state highway system, subject however, to such conditions, requirements, and mileage limits as provided for by law. The total mileage of the state highway system may be increased by not more than fifty miles [80.47 kilometers] in any one calendar year. In designating, locating, creating, and determining the several routes of the state highway system, the director shall take into account such factors as the actual or potential traffic volumes, the type of service class, the construction of bypasses and alternate routes, the conservation and development of the state’s natural resources, the general economy of the state and communities, and the desirability of fitting such system into the general scheme of the nationwide network of highways.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 29; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0102; S.L. 1959, ch. 227, § 1; 1975, ch. 236, § 3; 1977, ch. 230, § 1.

24-01-03.
Responsibility for state highway system.

The director is responsible for the construction, maintenance, and operation of the state highway system and may enter a cooperative agreement with any municipality for the construction, maintenance, or repair of any urban connecting street. The director may not divest the state from responsibility for maintaining the structural integrity of any bridge over a navigable water of this state which is currently maintained by the state unless an agreement is reached with the municipality.

The jurisdiction, control, and duty of the state and municipality with respect to such urban connecting streets must be as follows:

The director has no authority to change or establish any grade of any such street without approval of the governing body of such municipality.

The municipality shall maintain at its own expense all underground facilities in such streets and has the right to construct such additional underground facilities as may be necessary in such streets.

The municipality has the right to grant the privilege to open the surface of any such street, but all damage occasioned thereby must be repaired promptly by said municipality at its direction and without cost to the department.

The municipality has exclusive right to grant franchises over, beneath, and upon such streets.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 30; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0103; 2005, ch. 40, § 5.

Cross-References.

City may enter into agreement with highway department for certain improvements, see § 40-22-06.

24-01-03.1.
Highway performance classification plan.

To the extent possible, the department of transportation shall implement the highway performance classification plan.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 40, § 6.

24-01-04.
Municipalities to develop master street plan.

Except for a municipality located within a designated metropolitan planning organization, each municipality of over five thousand population in this state, according to the latest available census, shall develop and adopt a master street plan cooperatively between the director and the municipal officials, which must ensure the proper location and integration of the state highway connections in the total city street plan. In selecting and designating the master street plan, the cooperating officials shall take into account the more important principal streets that connect the residential areas with business areas, and the streets that carry the important rural traffic into and across the city, to ensure a system of streets upon which traffic can be controlled and protected, in such a manner as to provide safe and efficient movement of traffic within a municipality.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 47; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0104; 2009, ch. 229, § 1.

Cross-References.

Municipal master plans, see N.D.C.C. ch. 40-48.

24-01-04.1.
Metropolitan planning organizations.

Metropolitan planning organizations shall develop, in cooperation with the state and public transit operators, transportation plans and programs for metropolitan areas which encourage and promote the safe and efficient management, operation, and development of surface transportation systems that will serve the mobility needs of people and freight and foster economic growth and development within and through urbanized areas of this state while minimizing transportation-related fuel consumption, air pollution, and greenhouse gas emissions. The plans and programs for each metropolitan area must provide for the development and integrated management and operation of transportation systems and facilities, including pedestrian walkways and bicycle transportation facilities that will function as an intermodal transportation system for the metropolitan area. A metropolitan planning organization is a political subdivision for purposes of chapter 54-52.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 229, § 2.

24-01-04.2.
Corridors of commerce program — Corridors of commerce fund.

The department shall administer a corridors of commerce program for constructing, reconstructing, improving, and maintaining highways that improve freight transportation and facilitate commerce.

The corridors of commerce fund is a special fund in the state treasury administered by the department. The fund consists of all money deposited in the fund. Pursuant to legislative appropriations, the department shall use moneys in the fund for eligible highway projects in accordance with provisions of this section.

To be eligible for funding under this section:

Any construction work associated with the project must begin within three years after the department selects the project for funding, unless the department grants an exemption; and

The highway project must meet at least one of the following criteria:

The project is a segment of highway with the following characteristics:

The existing segment is not a divided highway;

At least one end of the segment connects to an expressway or freeway; and

The segment will connect to a proposed or existing interchange;

The project will ease the movement of freight traffic;

The project will improve safety on the highway;

The project will allow oversized or overweight vehicles to use the highway after completion;

The project will provide increased connectivity between areas of significant commerce; or

The highway is or will be designated as national high priority corridor of connectivity.

When evaluating eligible projects for funding under this section, the department shall score each eligible project, make the scores available to the public, and consider:

The return on investment;

Measurable improvements in commerce and economic competitiveness;

Efficiency in traffic flow based on average daily traffic counts, commercial vehicle miles traveled, and travel times;

Safety improvements;

Connections to regional trade centers or other modes of transportation; and

Community support for the project.

The funding provided to an eligible highway project may be used to plan, construct, replace, improve, or maintain the highway.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 222, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

24-01-05.
Designation of county system — Removal from state highway system.

The director may designate, from time to time, those roads selected under section 24-05-16, as the county highway system not exceeding twenty-two thousand five hundred miles [36210.24 kilometers] in length on which federal aid funds must be expended as may be provided by such appropriations. In designating such system, the director may remove from the state highway system those parts which are low in standard of improvement and type of traffic service and which will be released from maintenance agreement or agreements with the federal government. No mileage on the state highway system may be placed on the county road system without the consent of the board of county commissioners of the county in which the road lies. The director may enter into an agreement with the board of county commissioners of any county providing for the transfer of highways from the state highway system to the county road system of such county.

Source:

S.L. 1939, ch. 152, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 24-0105; S.L. 1945, ch. 199, § 1; 1947, ch. 201, § 1; 1955, ch. 177, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 24-0105; S.L. 1975, ch. 236, § 4; 1983, ch. 302, § 1.

24-01-06.
Authority to abandon sections of routes.

The director has the authority to abandon sections of routes on the state highway system when such abandoned sections are substantially replaced by improvements on new locations serving the area. Such abandonment may be made even though such highway is not placed on any other road system.

The abandonment order must be filed with the office of the recorder of each county in which the abandonment occurs.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 31; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0106; S.L. 1987, ch. 312, § 1; 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

24-01-07.
Maps of state, county, and municipal systems.

The department at all times shall provide and maintain a map of the state, which must show all the highways which have been designated, located, created, and constituted as part of the state highway system, the county road system, and the municipal arterial street system, and if practical the status of improvement thereof.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 32; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0107; S.L. 1985, ch. 299, § 1.

24-01-08.
Uniform marking and erection of signs on highway. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 353, § 4.

24-01-08.1.
Location of signs precluding the cultivation of right of way.

All signs erected by the department, after July 1, 1967, which give notice of the prohibition against the cultivation of the right of way, must be located as near as possible to right-of-way posts, or natural obstructions. All existing signs of such nature must be relocated according to the provisions contained in this section, and when requested by the landowner and a more suitable site can be agreed upon by the landowner and the department.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 205, § 1.

24-01-09.
Authority to prescribe traffic-control signals. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 353, § 4.

24-01-09.1.
State highway commissioner to adopt sign manual. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 353, § 4.

24-01-09.2.
State highway commissioner to place signs on all state highways. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 353, § 4.

24-01-10.
Local jurisdictions may provide additional capacity to state highway.

The governing board of any county, municipality, or township, as the case may be, may enter into a written agreement with the director for the construction of a roadway or structure of greater width or capacity than would be necessary to accommodate the normal state highway traffic, upon any state highway within its boundaries, and may appropriate from any funds available, and pay into the state highway fund, such sum or sums of money as may be agreed upon. Nothing herein contained prevents any such municipality from constructing the portions of the street not included in the state highway system independent of any contract with the department, if such construction conforms to such reasonable regulations as the department may prescribe as to grade and drainage.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 35; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0110.

Collateral References.

Widening of city street as local improvement justifying special assessment of adjacent property, 46 A.L.R.3d 127.

24-01-11.
Maintenance of additional width of state highway system in municipalities.

The governing body of any municipality may enter into a written agreement with the department for the maintenance of such additional width by the department, and from time to time in accordance with such agreement shall appropriate and pay into the state highway fund such sums of money as may be agreed upon. Nothing herein contained may be construed to prevent any such municipality from maintaining such additional width at its own expense subject to the written approval of the department.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 36; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0111.

24-01-12.
Regulation of advertising signs on highways.

No person, firm, corporation, or limited liability company may place, put, or maintain any sign, billboard, or advertisement within the limits of a public highway, or in any manner paint, print, place, put, or affix, or cause to be painted, printed, placed, or affixed, any advertisement on or to any stone, tree, fence, stump, pole, mileboard, milestone, danger sign, danger signal, guide sign, guidepost, billboard, building, or other object within the limits of a public highway, or place, put or maintain any sign or billboard upon private property within one thousand feet [304.8 meters] of any highway grade crossing in such place or manner as to obstruct or interfere with a free and clear view of such crossing from any highway or railroad intersecting thereat. None of the provisions of this section prohibit the placing of public notices on billboards erected for that purpose by authority of the governing body of a municipality. Any advertisement in or upon a public highway or private property which, in the judgment of the director, may be deemed to be a hazard to traffic, or in the future may tend to create a hazard to traffic, may be taken down, removed, or destroyed by direction or authority of the department in the case of the state highway system, by the board of county commissioners in the case of the county road system, and by the board of township supervisors in the case of township roads.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 37; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0112; S.L. 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

Cross-References.

Municipal power to regulate advertising in public places, see § 40-05-01.

Railroad crossing signs, advertising not to obstruct or resemble, see § 24-09-12.

Regulation of outdoor advertising adjacent to highways, see N.D.C.C. ch. 24-17.

Collateral References.

Municipal power as to billboards and outdoor advertising, 58 A.L.R.2d 1314.

24-01-12.1.
Harvesting hay on state highway system — Storage and removal.

Every person harvesting hay on the rights of way of the state highway system, who stores the harvested hay on the rights of way for later removal, shall store the harvested hay at the outer edge of the rights of way. The director may remove any hay that is not stored as prescribed in this section. All hay stored on the rights of way must be removed by November first of each year.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 326, § 1; 1987, ch. 313, § 1.

24-01-12.2.
Hay disposal.

Any stored hay remaining on the right of way on November first of each year must be disposed of in a manner deemed proper by the director.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 326, § 2; 1987, ch. 313, § 2.

24-01-12.3.
Entry into no-mow agreements.

No state agency or political subdivision of the state may enter into any agreement to increase the no-mow acres contained in the rights of way of the state highway system.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 271, § 1.

24-01-13.
Enforcement of highway laws — Vehicle size and weight controlled.

The director and each officer and inspector of the department designated by the director have general police powers with respect to enforcement of all laws pertaining to the use of motor vehicles and trailers, other than passenger cars and motorcycles, upon the highways, roads, and streets of this state and may:

Classify highways and enforce limitations as to weight and load of vehicles thereon as provided for under section 39-12-01.

Issue special written permits authorizing the operation of oversized or overweight vehicles as provided for under section 39-12-02.

Prohibit the operation or may impose restrictions on vehicular use of highways during certain seasons of the year as provided for under section 39-12-03.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 38; 1955, ch. 178, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0113; S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 1; 1973, ch. 222, § 1; 1979, ch. 187, § 37; 1997, ch. 51, § 15.

24-01-14.
Speed research.

The director may conduct investigations, research, and analysis of speed limits on any highway.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 39; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0114; S.L. 1959, ch. 285, § 1; 1967, ch. 323, § 78; 1975, ch. 349, § 1.

Cross-References.

Radar evidence of speed violations, see § 39-03-15.

Speed regulation by municipalities, see § 40-05-01.

Speed restrictions generally, see N.D.C.C. ch. 39-09.

24-01-15.
Director to designate through highways.

The director, with reference to highways under the director’s jurisdiction, may designate as through highways any state highway or part thereof and erect stop signs or yield signs at specified entrances thereto where vehicles are not otherwise required by law to stop or yield right of way.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 40; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0115; S.L. 1961, ch. 202, § 1; 1969, ch. 343, § 4.

24-01-16.
Erection and maintenance of guardrails.

The director has the authority to erect and maintain guardrails, stretch wires, and other devices on all highways under the director’s jurisdiction, in the interest of public safety.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 41; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0116.

24-01-17.
Grade crossing elimination.

The director has the authority to contract, on an equitable basis with any railway company, and to let all the necessary contracts for the construction of bridges, underpasses, and approaches necessary for the separation of grades at points of intersection between railroads and the state highways.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 42; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0117.

Cross-References.

Changing and closing railroad crossing, see § 24-09-10.

24-01-18.
Right of way and materials may be acquired by purchase or eminent domain.

The director, by order, on behalf of the state, and as part of the cost of constructing, reconstructing, widening, altering, changing, locating, relocating, aligning, realigning, or maintaining a state highway, or of providing a temporary road for public use, may purchase, acquire, take over, or, subject to section 32-15-01, condemn under the right and power of eminent domain, for the state, any and all lands in fee simple or such easements thereof which the director deems necessary for present public use, either temporary or permanent, or which the director deems necessary for reasonable future public use, and to provide adequate drainage in the improvement, construction, reconstruction, widening, altering, changing, locating, relocating, aligning, realigning, or maintaining of a state highway, provided, however, as to any and all lands acquired or taken for highway, road, or street purposes, the director may not obtain any rights or interest in or to the oil, gas, or fluid minerals on or underlying said lands. No county may be required to participate in the cost or expense of right of way for the state highway system. By the same means, the director may secure any and all materials, including clay, gravel, sand, or rock, or the lands necessary to secure such material, and the necessary land or easements thereover, to provide ways and access thereto. The director may acquire such land or materials notwithstanding that the title thereto may be vested in the state or any division thereof; provided, however, that no interests in gas, oil, or fluid minerals may be acquired by this procedure.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 90; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0118; S.L. 1959, ch. 228, § 1; 2007, ch. 293, § 13.

Cross-References.

Eminent domain generally, see N.D. Const., Art. I, § 16; N.D.C.C. ch. 32-15.

Interest taken for highway purposes limited to easement, see § 32-15-03.2.

Validation of pre-1929 proceedings for acquisition of right of way, see § 1-06-02.

24-01-18.1.
Right of way adjacent to customs and immigration.

Whenever the director finds that it will facilitate travel and promote public convenience or that it will avoid the need for additional road building, the director may procure rights of way and other interests in land adjacent to established public highways for the location of custom and immigration buildings to be erected by the federal government. The director is hereby vested with like power in the acquisition of such lands as the director may have in acquiring rights of way and land for highway purposes.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 192, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-01181.

24-01-18.2.
Sites for customs and immigration — Governor to convey.

When the federal government has requested title to any lands acquired by the director under the provisions of sections 24-01-18.1 and 24-01-18.2 and the director certifies that the establishment of custom and immigration points of entry thereon will facilitate travel and promote public convenience or will avoid the need for additional road building, the governor is authorized to convey to the United States of America such sites as may be required for the location of such buildings and accessory facilities including means of access thereto.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 192, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-01182.

24-01-19.
Board of county commissioners may determine damages.

If the director is unable to purchase land or materials with the necessary ways and access thereto, at what the director deems a reasonable valuation, then the board of county commissioners of the county wherein such land or materials may be situated, on petition of the director, shall proceed to ascertain and determine the damages and make awards in the manner provided by chapter 24-07 for lands taken for highway purposes as hereby modified or amended. Within fifteen days after the filing of such petition with the county auditor, the board of county commissioners shall fix a time and place, not later than sixty days from and after the filing of such petition, for a hearing of all persons interested or aggrieved by such taking, and shall cause to be published in the official newspaper of the county, at least once a week, for three successive weeks, prior to such hearing, a notice of such hearing, stating the time and place where the same shall be held, together with a description of the property to be taken. Such published notice must be in lieu of all other notices, and when so published must give the said board of county commissioners full and complete jurisdiction to proceed with the determination of awards of damages. A copy of such notice must be served personally upon all known owners residing or found within the state, and upon the occupant of the land, not less than fifteen days prior to such hearing, in the manner provided for the service of a summons in the district court, and in case of personal service of such notice upon all persons interested in any manner in said real property, as disclosed by the records in the office of the recorder of the county wherein said property is located, no publication of such notice may be made.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 91; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0119; S.L. 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

24-01-20.
Damages to be paid into court.

When the award of damages for the taking of land or materials, or both, has been completed by the board of county commissioners, the director shall pay, or cause to be paid from the state highway fund, into court, for the benefit of the owners of land to whom such awards have been made, by depositing with the clerk of court of such county cash in the amount of such award or awards.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 92; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0120.

24-01-21.
Receipt to be signed by owner or clerk of court.

Every owner entitled to an award for damages, before the same is paid to the owner by the clerk of court, shall sign and execute a receipt therefor. Such receipt must contain a description of the premises covered by the award. In case the owner fails or refuses to accept such award and execute such receipt therefor, the clerk of court shall execute a receipt, reciting the deposit of such award with the owner and the description of the premises covered by the award.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 93; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0121.

Collateral References.

Governmental tort liability for detour accidents, 1 A.L.R.5th 163.

24-01-22.
Title vests after thirty days if no appeal taken.

At the expiration of thirty days from the award by the board of county commissioners from which no appeal has been taken as provided in section 24-01-23, whenever such money has been deposited in the office of the clerk of court, the receipt of the owners of said property, or of such clerk of court, must be recorded in the office of the recorder of the county in which such real estate is situated, and the title to the land or materials thereupon must be vested in the state.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 94; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0122; S.L. 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

Cross-References.

Interest taken for highway purposes limited to easement, see § 32-15-03.2.

Validation of pre-1929 proceedings for acquisition of right of way, see § 1-06-02.

24-01-22.1.
Appeal after deposit for taking.

Within thirty days after notice has been given in writing to the landowner by the clerk of the district court that a deposit has been made for a taking of right of way as authorized by section 16 of article I of the Constitution of North Dakota, the owner of the property taken may appeal to the district court by serving a notice of appeal upon the acquiring agency, and the matter must be tried at the next regular or special term of court with a jury unless a jury is waived, in the manner prescribed for trials under chapter 32-15.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 189, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-01221; S.L. 1989, ch. 69, § 18.

24-01-23.
Appeals from decision of board of county commissioners — Procedure — Special term of court.

Any party aggrieved by the proceedings of the director in the taking of land or materials, or by the estimate of damages and the award of the board of county commissioners has the remedies provided in this title for appeal from any determination of a board of county commissioners in the taking of land for highway purposes. Service of a written or printed notice of such appeal must be made upon the chairman of the board of county commissioners and the director. An appeal from the award by the board of county commissioners, without filing a cost bond, may be taken by the director, by service of notice of appeal upon the chairman of the board of county commissioners and the owner of the property, in the manner provided by law for the service of a summons in a civil action. Upon any appeal, the director, on application to the judge of the district court, must be granted a special term of court, in the manner provided in cases of eminent domain in chapter 32-15.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 95; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0123.

Cross-References.

Special term of court, see § 32-15-16.

Parties Respondent on Appeal.

Members of board of county commissioners are not proper parties respondent on an appeal from their decision and judgment may not be rendered against them. Lineburg v. Sandven, 74 N.D. 364, 21 N.W.2d 808, 1946 N.D. LEXIS 68 (N.D. 1946).

24-01-24.
Appeal does not stay condemnation proceedings. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

24-01-25.
Fees not charged for recording instruments.

No fees may be charged or collected by the county auditor, the recorder, or the clerk of court for any services rendered for the recording or filing of any document required under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 177, § 97; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 24-0125; S.L. 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2013, ch. 258, § 2.

Cross-References.

Instruments entitled to record without regard to taxes, see § 11-18-03.